New York, session 2025-2026, A7638.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 14 of the transportation law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 16-a to read as follows: 3 16-a. The commissioner shall ensure that fog lines are added to all 4 state highways and other public ways under the jurisdiction of the 5 department when such highway or public way is repaved. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 7 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09698-01-5